Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-2427
Improvement district; adjacent land; how treated; special assessments.

Any city of the first class, city of the second class, or village may include land adjacent to such city or village when creating an improvement district, such as a sewer, paving, water, water extension, or sanitary sewer extension district. The city council or village board of trustees may levy a special assessment for the costs of such improvements upon the properties found specially benefited thereby, except as provided in sections 19-2428 to 19-2431.

Laws 1979, LB 136, § 4;

Laws 1983, LB 94, § 4;

Laws 1987, LB 679, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB361, § 46;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 165.